Maine, session 132, LD123.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §85, sub-§3, ¶C, as amended by PL 2011, c. 271, §8, is further
amended to read:
C. The person must have successfully completed a state cognitive test for basic
emergency medical treatment and a board-approved practical evaluation assessment of
emergency medical treatment skills.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §85, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2011, c. 271, §9, is further
amended to read:
B. The person must have satisfactorily demonstrated competence in the skills required
for the license level. Skill competence may be satisfied by a combination of run report
reviews and continuing education training programs conducted in accordance with the
rules or by satisfactorily completing the state cognitive test and a board-approved
practical evaluation assessment of emergency medical treatment skills.
Page 1 - 132LR0300(03)